Washington statutes.
RCW 13.90.030

Petition for guardianship—Hearing.

(1) At the hearing on a vulnerable youth guardianship petition, both parties, the vulnerable youth and the proposed guardian, have the right to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. The rules of evidence apply to the conduct of the hearing.

(2) A vulnerable youth guardianship must be established if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(a) The allegations in the petition are true;

(b) It is in the vulnerable youth's best interest to establish a vulnerable youth guardianship; and

(c) The vulnerable youth consents in writing to the appointment of a guardian.

(3) A guardianship established under subsection (2) of this section remains in effect as provided in RCW 13.90.060.

[ 2017 c 279 s 5.]